Montana, session 2025, HB347.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

Section 1. Section 87-1-301, MCA, is amended to read:
"87-1-301. Powers of commission. (1) Except as provided in subsections (6) and (7), the
commission:
(a) shall set the policies for the protection, preservation, management, and propagation of the
wildlife, fish, game, furbearers, waterfowl, nongame species, and endangered species of the state and for the
fulfillment of all other responsibilities of the department related to fish and wildlife as provided by law;
(b) shall establish the hunting, fishing, and trapping rules of the department;
(c) except as provided in 23-1-111 and 87-1-303(3), shall establish the rules of the department
governing the use of lands owned or controlled by the department and waters under the jurisdiction of the
department;
(d) must have the power within the department to establish wildlife refuges and bird and game
preserves;
(e) shall approve all acquisitions or transfers by the department of interests in land or water, except
as provided in 23-1-111 and 87-1-209(2) and (4);
(f) except as provided in 23-1-111, shall review and approve the budget of the department prior to
its transmittal to the office of budget and program planning;
(g) except as provided in 23-1-111, shall review and approve construction projects that have an
estimated cost of more than $1,000 but less than $5,000;
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 347

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 347.1
(h) shall manage elk, deer, and antelope populations based on habitat estimates determined as
provided in 87-1-322 and maintain elk, deer, and antelope population numbers at or below population estimates
as provided in 87-1-323. In developing or implementing an elk management plan, the commission shall
consider landowner tolerance when deciding whether to restrict elk hunting on surrounding public land in a
particular hunting district. As used in this subsection (1)(h), "landowner tolerance" means the written or
documented verbal opinion of an affected landowner regarding the impact upon the landowner's property within
the particular hunting district where a restriction on elk hunting on public property is proposed.
(i) shall set the policies for the salvage of antelope, deer, elk, or moose pursuant to 87-3-145;
(j) shall comply with, adopt policies that comply with, and ensure the department implements in
each region the provisions of state wildlife management plans adopted following an environmental review
conducted pursuant to Title 75, chapter 1, parts 1 through 3; and
(k) shall review and approve the issuance of an either-sex or antlerless elk license, permit, or
combination thereof to a landowner or a landowner's designee pursuant to 87-2-513.
(2) The commission may adopt rules regarding the use and type of archery equipment that may be
employed for hunting and fishing purposes, taking into account applicable standards as technical innovations in
archery equipment change.
(3) The commission may adopt rules regarding the establishment of special licenses or permits,
seasons, conditions, programs, or other provisions that the commission considers appropriate to promote or
enhance hunting by Montana's youth and persons with disabilities.
(4) (a) The commission may adopt rules regarding nonresident big game combination licenses to:
(i) separate deer licenses from nonresident elk combination licenses;
(ii) set the fees for the separated deer combination licenses and the elk combination licenses
without the deer tag;
(iii) condition the use of the deer licenses; and
(iv) limit the number of licenses sold.
(b) The commission may exercise the rulemaking authority in subsection (4)(a) when it is
necessary and appropriate to regulate the harvest by nonresident big game combination license holders:
(i) for the biologically sound management of big game populations of elk, deer, and antelope;
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 347

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 347.1
(ii) to control the impacts of those elk, deer, and antelope populations on uses of private property;
and
(iii) to ensure that elk, deer, and antelope populations are at a sustainable level as provided in 87-
1-321 through 87-1-325.
(5) (a) Subject to the provisions of subsection (5)(b), the commission may adopt rules to:
(i) limit the number of nonresident mountain lion hunters in designated hunting districts; and
(ii) determine the conditions under which nonresidents may hunt mountain lion in designated
hunting districts.
(b) The commission shall adopt rules for the use of and set quotas for the sale of Class D-4
nonresident hound licenses by hunting district, portions of a hunting district, group of districts, or administrative
regions.
(c) The commission shall consider, but is not limited to consideration of, the following factors:
(i) harvest of lions by resident and nonresident hunters;
(ii) history of quota overruns;
(iii) composition, including age and sex, of the lion harvest;
(iv) historical outfitter use;
(v) conflicts among hunter groups;
(vi) availability of public and private lands; and
(vii) whether restrictions on nonresident hunters are more appropriate than restrictions on all
hunters.
(6) The commission may not regulate the use or possession of firearms, firearm accessories, or
ammunition, including the chemical elements of ammunition used for hunting. This does not prevent:
(a) the restriction of certain hunting seasons to the use of specified hunting arms, such as the
establishment of special archery seasons and the special muzzleloader heritage hunting season established in
87-1-304;
(b) for human safety, the restriction of certain areas to the use of only specified hunting arms,
including bows and arrows, traditional handguns, and muzzleloading rifles;
(c) the restriction of the use of shotguns for the hunting of deer and elk pursuant to 87-6-401(1)(f);
- 3 - Authorized Print Version – HB 347

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 347.1
(d) the regulation of migratory game bird hunting pursuant to 87-3-403; or
(e) the restriction of the use of rifles for bird hunting pursuant to 87-6-401(1)(g) or (1)(h).
(7) Pursuant to 23-1-111, the commission does not oversee department activities related to the
administration of state parks, primitive parks, state recreational areas, public camping grounds, state historic
sites, state monuments, and other heritage and recreational resources, land, and water administered pursuant
to Title 23, chapter 1, and Title 23, chapter 2, parts 1, 4, and 9.
(8) The commission may adopt rules regarding hunter orange, or similarly visible clothing
materials, to be worn by a person as a safety measure while hunting or while accompanying another person
who is hunting."

Section 2. Section 87-6-404, MCA, is amended to read:
"87-6-404. Unlawful use of dog while hunting. (1) Except as provided in subsections (3) through
(6), a person may not:
(a) chase any game animal or fur-bearing animal with a dog; or
(b) purposely, knowingly, or negligently permit a dog to chase, stalk, pursue, attack, or kill a
hooved game animal. If the dog is not under the control of an adult at the time of the violation, the owner of the
dog is personally responsible. A defense that the dog was allowed to run at large by another person is not
allowable unless it is shown that at the time of the violation, the dog was running at large without the consent of
the owner and that the owner took reasonable precautions to prevent the dog from running at large.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (3)(g), a peace officer, game warden, or other person
authorized to enforce the Montana fish and game laws who witnesses a dog chasing, stalking, pursuing,
attacking, or killing a hooved game animal may destroy that dog on public land or on private land at the request
of the landowner without criminal or civil liability.
(3) A person may:
(a) take game birds during the appropriate open season with the aid of a dog;
(b) hunt mountain lions during the winter open season, as established by the commission, with the
aid of a dog or dogs;
(c) hunt bobcats during the trapping season, as established by the commission, with the aid of a
- 4 - Authorized Print Version – HB 347

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 347.1
dog or dogs;
(d) subject to subsection (5), hunt black bears during the spring season with the aid of a dog or
dogs as authorized by the commission;
(e) train bird hunting dogs pursuant to the requirements of 87-3-602;
(f) conduct field trials for bird hunting dogs pursuant to the requirements of 87-3-603 or on private
land; and
(g) use trained or controlled dogs to chase or herd away game animals or fur-bearing animals to
protect humans, lawns, gardens, livestock, or agricultural products, including growing crops and stored hay and
grain. The dog may not be destroyed pursuant to subsection (2).
(4) A resident who possesses a Class D-3 resident hound training license may:
(a) pursue mountain lions and bobcats with a dog or dogs during a training season from December
2 of each year to April 14 of the following year; and
(b) pursue black bears with a dog or dogs during a training season from the end of the spring
season for black bear through June 15 of that year as authorized by the commission.
(5) A nonresident who possesses a Class D-4 hound license may pursue mountain lions or black
bears with a dog or dogs pursuant to 87-2-519.
(6) (a) A person with a valid hunting license issued pursuant to Title 87, chapter 2, may use a dog
to track a wounded game animal during an appropriate open season. Any person using a dog in this manner:
(i) shall maintain physical control of the dog at all times by means of a maximum 50-foot lead
attached to the dog's collar or harness;
(ii) during the general season, whether handling or accompanying the dog, shall wear hunter
orange material pursuant to 87-6-414;
(iii)(ii) may carry any weapon allowed by law;
(iv)(iii) may dispose of the wounded game animal using any weapon allowed by the valid hunting
license; and
(v)(iv) shall tag an animal that has been reduced to possession in accordance with 87-6-411.
(b) Dog handlers tracking a wounded game animal with a dog are exempt from licensing
requirements under Title 87, chapter 2, as long as they are accompanied by the licensed hunter who wounded
- 5 - Authorized Print Version – HB 347

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 347.1
the game animal.
(7) A person who is convicted of or who forfeits bond or bail after being charged with a violation of
this section shall be fined not less than $50 or more than $1,000 or be imprisoned in the county detention
center for not more than 6 months, or both. In addition, the person, upon conviction or forfeiture of bond or bail,
may be subject to forfeiture of any current hunting, fishing, or trapping license issued by this state and the
privilege to hunt, fish, and trap in this state or to use state lands, as defined in 77-1-101, for recreational
purposes for a period of time set by the court.
(8) A violation of this section may also result in an order to pay restitution pursuant to 87-6-905
through 87-6-907."

NEW SECTION. Section 3. Repealer. The following section of the Montana Code Annotated is
repealed:
87-6-414. Failure to wear hunter orange while big game hunting.
- END -
- 6 - Authorized Print Version – HB 347